Maine, session 132, LD502.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §610-B, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 209, §4, is amended
to read:
2-A. Voluntary, technology-forcing emission standard. An outdoor wood boiler
meeting a particulate matter emission limit of 0.06 0.32 pounds per million British Thermal
Units heat output is not subject to a setback requirement as long as it meets the stack height
requirements for an outdoor wood boiler meeting the emission standard in subsection 2 in
accordance with rules adopted by the department.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §610-B, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
A. Notwithstanding section 592-A, the rules must include a definition of "nuisance
condition" specifically relating to the operation of outdoor wood boilers.
B. The rules may not prohibit the emission of a smoke plume from an outdoor wood
boiler, regardless of whether such emission remains upon the property of the owner of
the outdoor wood boiler or crosses onto any adjacent land or buildings not owned by
the owner.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §610-B, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 442, §2, is repealed.